Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.340

Rules of practice.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of the code of procedure concerning civil actions are applicable to and constitute the rules of practice in the proceedings in this chapter.

[ 1895 c 65 s 34; RRS s 1032.]